Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Article 7. Effective Date; Previous Transactions

§ 40-14-701.
Time of taking effect; provisions for transition. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 9-101; W.S. 1957, §

40-9-101

; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-14-702.
Continuation of licensing. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 9-102; W.S. 1957, §

40-9-102

; repealed by 2021 ch. 14, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.